Illinois, session 104th, HB34.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 529-25 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/29-25 new)7    Sec. 29-25. Prohibit firearms in polling places. Any 8person who carries or possesses a firearm while present in a 9polling place, except a peace officer in the performance of 10his or her official duties, shall be guilty of a Class C 11misdemeanor.